Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2987.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 11-103.6a-1,
is amended to read as follows:
Section 11-103.6a-1. A. All subject matter standards and
revisions to the standards adopted by the State Board of Education
pursuant to Section 11-103.6a of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes
shall be subject to legislative review as set forth in this section.
The standards shall not be implemented by the State Board of

HB2987 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Educ ation until the legislative review process is completed as
provided for in this section.
B. Upon adoption of any subject matter standards, the State
Board of Education shall submit the adopted standards to the Speaker
of the House of Representatives or a designee and the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate or a designee prior to the last thirty (30)
days of the legislative session.
C. By adoption of a joint resolution, the Legislature shall
approve the standards, disapprove the standards in whole or in part,
amend the standards in whole or in part or disapprove the standards
in whole or in part with instructions to the State Board of
Education, provided that such joint resolution becomes law in
accordance with Section 11 of Article VI of the Oklahoma
Constitution. If the joint resolution is vetoed by the Governor in
accordance with Section 11 of Article VI of the Oklahoma
Constitution and the veto has not been overridden, the standards
shall be deemed approved. If the Legislature fails to adopt a joint
resolution within thirty (30) legislative days following submission
of the standards, the standards shall be deemed approved
disapproved.
D. If the subject matter standards are disapproved in whole or
are disapproved in whole with instructions as provided for in this
section, the State Board of Education may adopt new standards and
submit the new standards for legislative review pursuant to this
HB2987 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

sect ion. The State Board of Education shall continue to implement
current standards in place until the new standards have been
reviewed by the Legislature and approved as provided for in this
section. If the subject matter standards are amended, approved in
part or are disapproved in part with instructions, the State Board
of Education may revise the standards in accordance with the
legislative changes and implement the standards.
E. Upon final approval of the standards, the standards shall be
considered final agency rules. The Board shall submit a copy of the
standards to the Secretary of State, who shall include the standards
in the publication known as the "Oklahoma Administrative Code" in
the same manner as agency rules are published in the "Code" as
provided for in the Administrative Procedures Act. All standards
approved and published as provided for in this subsection shall have
the same force and effect of law as agency rules promulgated
pursuant to the Administrative Procedures Act.
F. Unless otherwise provided by specific vote of the
Legislature, joint resolutions introduced for purposes of approving,
disapproving, amending or disapproving with instructions any subject
matter standards shall not be subject to regular legislative cutoff
dates, shall be limited to such provisions as may be necessary for
approving, disapproving, amending or disapproving with instructions
any subject matter standards and any such other direction or mandate

HB2987 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

rega rding the standards deemed necessary by the Legislature. The
joint resolution shall contain no other provisions.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION OVERSIGHT, dated
03/02/2026 - DO PASS, As Coauthored.



















HB2987 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.